Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 3

Procedures

5-9-301. Book of appropriation applications.

It is the duty of the county clerk to keep a book in which applications for appropriation shall be entered when made to the county legislative body, and the same shall be open for the inspection of the citizens of the county.

The county legislative body shall not consider or make any appropriation unless the same shall have first been entered in a book as heretofore required.

Acts 1875, ch. 63, §§ 5, 6; impl. am. Acts 1875, ch. 70, §§ 1, 3; Shan., §§ 6017, 6018; Code 1932, §§ 10216, 10217; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-910.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 16.

5-9-302. Vote on appropriations.

In making appropriations of money, the vote of the members of the county legislative body present shall be taken by ayes and nayes, the clerk calling and recording the name of each member, together with each member's vote, aye or no, as it is given, which shall be entered on the minutes, together with the items of allowance.

Code 1858, § 4195 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 15); Shan., § 6015; Code 1932, § 10214; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-911.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 24.

5-9-303. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 5-9-303 (Code 1858, § 4217; Shan., § 6047; Code 1932, § 10252; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-912), concerning warrant requirement for disbursements, was deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2005. Comparable provisions are found in § 5-9-307(a).

5-9-304. Revenue docket — Entry of claims.

In the revenue docket shall be entered all appropriations or allowances made by the county legislative body, all claims of jurors and officers for attendance, and all other claims chargeable against the county.

The entry shall set forth the character, description, purpose, date and amount of every appropriation or allowance, and the minute book and page where the allowance was made.

Code 1858, §§ 496, 498; Shan., §§ 654, 656; Code 1932, §§ 1053, 1055; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-913.

Cross-References. Revenue docket, § 5-8-106.

5-9-305. Revenue docket — Jurors' claims.

The evidence upon which claims of jurors shall be entered shall be a list of the same, with the number of days each has served, and the amount due to such juror, made out by the clerk of the court in which the service was rendered, under the seal of the court, delivered to the county clerk.

Code 1858, § 497; Shan., § 655; Code 1932, § 1054; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-914.

5-9-306. Revenue docket — Entry prerequisite to warrant issuance.

No warrant shall be drawn for any claim against the county treasury until the claim has been registered, by order of the county mayor, in the revenue docket.

Code 1858, § 526; Shan., § 671; Code 1932, § 1067; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-915; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 3.

5-9-307. Warrant of county mayor required.

No money shall be drawn out of the treasury of the county except upon the warrant of the county mayor.

Upon the absence, death or incapacity of the county mayor, the chair of the county legislative body appointed pursuant to § 5-5-103(g), shall serve in the office of county mayor and may draw warrants upon the treasury of the county in the performance of the duties of office.

Before commencing service as county mayor under this subsection (b), the chair of the county legislative body shall be bonded in accordance with § 5-6-109.

This subsection (b) shall not apply in any county that has a population according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census of:

not less than nor more than

12,725 12,825

20,300 20,400

21,325 21,425

22,277 22,350

22,500 22,600

23,850 23,900

25,300 25,350

Code 1858, § 422 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 253, § 8; 1857-1858, ch. 38, § 8); Shan., § 518; Code 1932, § 770; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-916; Acts 1984, ch. 780, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 24; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, §§ 3, 4.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. LeClercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689 (1980).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county executive (now county mayor) over county finance office, OAG 99-032, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/18/99).

County executive's [now county mayor's] authority over sheriff's department purchasing, OAG 99-051, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (3/4/99).

5-9-308. Bills of cost — Certification.

No warrant shall be drawn for costs against a county, unless the same has been regularly taxed by the clerk, examined by the presiding judge of the court in which the costs accrued, and by them certified, under the seal of the court, to be correctly taxed and lawfully chargeable upon the county.

In making the certificate, the judge shall certify the aggregate amount of each bill of cost, writing the aggregate amount in both words and figures, and no bill of cost shall be paid unless so certified.

Code 1858, § 527; Acts 1897, ch. 29, § 1; Shan., § 672; Code 1932, § 1068; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-917; Acts 1998, ch. 1080, §§ 1, 2.

5-9-309. Bills of cost — Correction.

If the county mayor, when a bill of costs authenticated as provided for in § 5-9-308 is presented to the county mayor, and the county mayor's warrant for the payment of the same demanded, conceives that the bill of costs, or any part of it, is not lawfully chargeable to the county, the county mayor may defer the issuance of the county mayor's warrant until the county mayor has moved the court for a correction of the taxation.

Code 1858, § 528; Shan., § 673; Code 1932, § 1069; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-918; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-9-310. Bills of cost — Disallowance.

The county mayor, after the bills referred to in § 5-9-308 have been examined and approved by the judge and district attorney general, is granted full power, and it is made the county mayor's duty, to examine into, inspect and audit all bills of cost accruing against the county, and disallow any part of the bills of cost that may be illegally or wrongfully taxed against the county.

The county mayor may disallow any and all costs taxed against the county on account of malicious, frivolous, or unnecessary prosecution, in the event the judge and district attorney general should, by mistake or otherwise, approve any of such bills.

Acts 1891 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 5; Shan., § 674; mod. Code 1932, § 1070; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-919; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-9-311. Pauper's burial — Affidavit.

No warrant shall be drawn to pay for the funeral or cremation expenses of a pauper, unless the claim is accompanied by an affidavit showing the cost of the same, that the expenses were incurred for the interment of a pauper in the county, and that the claimant has no other means of obtaining payment.

Code 1858, § 529; Shan., § 675; Code 1932, § 1071; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-920; Acts 2003, ch. 51, § 2.

5-9-312. Judgment against county — Tax levy.

Where judgment is obtained against a county, the county legislative body shall impose a tax to pay it, at the next regular imposition of taxes after the judgment; and the taxes, when levied and collected, shall be immediately applied to the payment of such judgment.

Code 1858, § 534 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 90, § 1; 1857-1858, ch. 15, §§ 3, 4); Shan., § 681; Code 1932, § 1077; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-921.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 9.

5-9-313. Judgment against county — Mandamus.

If, upon application of the person owning the judgment, the county legislative body refuses to impose the tax, a mandamus may be issued from either of the courts of law or equity in the county, ordering and compelling the imposition of a tax sufficient to discharge the amount of the judgment; or the party owning the judgment may appeal from the refusal of the county legislative body to impose the tax to the next term of the circuit court for the county.

On trial of the appeal, the circuit court may make an order on the county legislative body, in the nature of a peremptory mandamus, to impose, levy and collect the tax, which order or peremptory mandamus shall be served on a majority of the members of the county legislative body. Service of the mandamus nisi on the county mayor shall be sufficient.

Code 1858, §§ 535, 536 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 90, § 2; 1857-1858, ch. 15, §§ 5, 7); Shan., §§ 682, 683; Code 1932, §§ 1078, 1079; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-922; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Law Reviews.

Methods of Judicial Review over Administrative Actions in Tennessee, 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 657 (1984).